Hawaii statutes.
[§88F-11] Costs of the plan. Costs for
implementing and administering the plan shall be borne by the plan and its
participants, except for incidental expenses, such as the cost of payroll
deductions and the routine processing of forms. [L 1996, c 212, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next